Massachusetts, session 194th, H1868.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended in section 29, after paragraph 3 by adding the following paragraph:-
"A person who is arrested as a result of a trial default warrant, shall only be subject to
bail by a justice in the issuing court or a justice in the district in which such warrant was
executed, and prior to any release such person may be required to pay all or a portion of any cost
imposed by the issuing justice, unless remitted by the presenting justice. Such type of trial
default warrant shall be distinctly and separately identified as “Trial Default Warrant” on the
docket sheet and in Criminal Offender Registration Index, and in the Massachusetts Warrant
System (MWS). A “Trial Default Warrant” is a default warrant issued by a justice, on the day a
of 2

person is scheduled to appear in court for a trial and such person fails to appear for trial, and the
Commonwealth provides a list of witnesses who have appeared with a certification that the
Commonwealth was ready for trial, and such failure to appear is without justifiable excuse. Such
certification of the Commonwealth must be placed with the clerk on the day of the warrant is
issued."
of 2